Florida, session 2026, HB395.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (6) is added to section 39.4085,
Florida Statutes, to read:
39.4085 Goals for dependent children; responsibilities;
education; Office of the Children's Ombudsman.—
(6)(a) The department shall coordinate with organizations
that are focused on empowering children with lived experience.
The department and such organizations must meet quarterly, at a
minimum, in person or via teleconference or other electronic
means to solicit input on ways to address challenges and
opportunities for children in the child welfare system. Each
meeting must have a formal agenda and such agenda and the
minutes from each meeting must be made available on the
department's website.
(b) Each community-based care lead agency shall coordinate
with organizations that are focused on empowering children with
lived experience. The community-based care lead agency and such
organizations must meet quarterly, at a minimum, in person or
via teleconference or other electronic means to solicit input on
ways to address challenges and opportunities for children in the
child welfare system. Each meeting must have a formal agenda and
such agenda and the minutes from each meeting must be made
available on the community-based care lead agency's website.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb395-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 395 2026
(c) By February 1 and August 1 of each year, beginning in
2027, the department and each community-based care lead agency
must make publicly accessible on their respective websites a
report that outlines how the department and the community-based
care lead agencies have implemented the suggestions of the
organizations based on the meetings required in paragraphs (a)
and (b).
Section 2. Subsection (5) of section 409.145, Florida
Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (6), paragraph (b) of
subsection (2) is amended, and a new subsection (5) is added to
that section, to read:
409.145 Care of children; "reasonable and prudent parent"
standard.—The child welfare system of the department shall
operate as a coordinated community-based system of care which
empowers all caregivers for children in foster care to provide
quality parenting, including approving or disapproving a child's
participation in activities based on the caregiver's assessment
using the "reasonable and prudent parent" standard.
(2) REASONABLE AND PRUDENT PARENT STANDARD.—
(b) Application of standard of care.—
1. Every child who comes into out-of-home care pursuant to
this chapter is entitled to participate in age-appropriate
extracurricular, enrichment, and social activities and to
receive a weekly cash allowance for personal use in accordance
with subsection (5).
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb395-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 395 2026
2. Each caregiver shall use the reasonable and prudent
parent standard in determining whether to give permission for a
child living in out-of-home care to participate in
extracurricular, enrichment, or social activities. When using
the reasonable and prudent parent standard, the caregiver must
consider:
a. The child's age, maturity, and developmental level to
maintain the overall health and safety of the child.
b. The potential risk factors and the appropriateness of
the extracurricular, enrichment, or social activity.
c. The best interest of the child, based on information
known by the caregiver.
d. The importance of encouraging the child's emotional and
developmental growth.
e. The importance of providing the child with the most
family-like living experience possible.
f. The behavioral history of the child and the child's
ability to safely participate in the proposed activity.
(5) CASH ALLOWANCE.—
(a) The Legislature finds that receiving a cash allowance
is a critical aspect of normalcy for a child. A cash allowance
teaches a child the value and use of money and it promotes
independence, responsibility, and decisionmaking. A caregiver is
also encouraged to offer the opportunity to earn money through
100 chores to a child placed in his or her care and to help such
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb395-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 395 2026
101 child obtain employment if the child wants to be employed.
102 (b) A caregiver must provide each child in his or her
103 care, beginning when the child attains 6 years of age, a weekly
104 cash allowance that is not tied to the child's behavior or the
105 completion of his or her chores. A caregiver may not withhold
106 the child's allowance as a form of punishment. A child is not
107 expected to use his or her allowance to purchase personal
108 hygiene items, school supplies, clothing, or other necessities
109 that are the responsibility of the child's caregiver. The
110 minimum allowance is as follows:
111 1. For children ages 6 to 12 years, $1 for each year of
112 age per week.
113 2. For children ages 13 to 17 years, $20 per week.
114 (c) The department may adopt rules to implement this
115 subsection.
116 Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb395-00